Maryland, session 2025, HB1552.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 24. MARYLAND COMMISSION FOR MEN’S HEALTH.
13–2401.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “COMMISSION” MEANS THE MARYLAND COMMISSION FOR
MEN’S HEALTH.
13–2402.
THERE IS A MARYLAND COMMISSION FOR MEN’S HEALTH IN THE
DEPARTMENT.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1552*

HOUSE BILL 1552
13–2403.
(A) THE COMMISSION CONSISTS OF:
(1) FOUR INDIVIDUALS APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR, WITH THE
ADVICE AND CONSENT OF THE SENATE;
(2) FOUR INDIVIDUALS APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE
SENATE; AND
(3) FOUR INDIVIDUALS APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE.
(B) (1) THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS OF THE COMMISSION SHALL BE
APPOINTED FROM AMONG APPLICANTS WHO HAVE BEEN NOMINATED AND
RECOMMENDED FOR APPOINTMENT BY ORGANIZATIONS LOCATED IN THE STATE
WHOSE INTERESTS RELATE TO MEN’S HEALTH OR FAMILY INVOLVEMENT:
(I) TWO MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR;
(II) TWO MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE
SENATE; AND
(III) TWO MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE
HOUSE.
(2) THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS OF THE COMMISSION SHALL BE
APPOINTED FROM APPLICANTS APPLYING ON THEIR OWN BEHALF:
(I) TWO MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR;
(II) TWO MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE
SENATE; AND
(III) TWO MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE
HOUSE.
(C) (1) THE TERM OF A MEMBER IS 4 YEARS.
(2) AT THE END OF A TERM, THE MEMBER CONTINUES TO SERVE
UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND QUALIFIES.

HOUSE BILL 1552 3
(3) A MEMBER WHO IS APPOINTED AFTER A TERM HAS BEGUN SERVES
ONLY FOR THE REST OF THE TERM AND UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND
QUALIFIES.
(4) A MEMBER MAY NOT SERVE MORE THAN TWO CONSECUTIVE
TERMS.
(D) A MEMBER:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
COMMISSION; BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(E) A MEMBER WHO FAILS TO ATTEND AT LEAST 50% OF THE REGULARLY
SCHEDULED MEETINGS DURING A 12–MONTH PERIOD SHALL BE CONSIDERED TO
HAVE RESIGNED.
13–2404.
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL ELECT A CHAIR AND A VICE CHAIR FROM
AMONG ITS MEMBERS.
(B) THE COMMISSION MAY APPOINT ANY OFFICERS THAT IT CONSIDERS
NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT ITS DUTIES.
13–2405.
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) DEVELOP STRATEGIES AND PROGRAMS, INCLUDING COMMUNITY
OUTREACH AND PUBLIC–PRIVATE PARTNERSHIPS, DESIGNED TO:
(I) RAISE PUBLIC AWARENESS OF MEN’S HEALTH ISSUES,
INCLUDING HEALTH PROBLEMS THAT DISPROPORTIONATELY AFFECT MEN AND THE
IMPORTANCE OF PATERNAL INFLUENCE IN THE FAMILY;
(II) ENCOURAGE THE PARTICIPATION OF MEN IN HEALTHY
BEHAVIORS AND FAMILY INVOLVEMENT;

HOUSE BILL 1552
(III) EDUCATE MARYLAND MEN ON THE BENEFITS OF REGULAR
PHYSICIAN CHECKUPS, EARLY DETECTION AND PREVENTIVE HEALTH SCREENING
TESTS, AND HEALTHY LIFESTYLE PRACTICES; AND
(IV) REDUCE OR ELIMINATE DISPARITIES IN MORBIDITY AND
MORTALITY FOR SPECIFIC DISEASES AMONG RACIAL AND ETHNIC MINORITIES AND
UNDERSERVED POPULATIONS;
(2) REVIEW THE HEALTH STATUS OF MEN IN THE STATE AND FOCUS
ON HEALTH OUTCOMES OF MEN FOR SPECIFIC DISEASES, INCLUDING PROSTATE
AND TESTICULAR CANCER, ORAL CANCER, CARDIOVASCULAR DISEASE,
DEPRESSION, AND DIABETES;
(3) ORGANIZE COMMUNITY WORKSHOPS TO IDENTIFY ISSUES
AFFECTING MEN’S HEALTH AND FAMILY INVOLVEMENT;
(4) MONITOR FEDERAL AND STATE POLICY AND LEGISLATION THAT
MAY AFFECT THE AREAS OF MEN’S HEALTH AND FAMILY INVOLVEMENT; AND
(5) RECOMMEND ASSISTANCE, SERVICES, AND POLICY CHANGES
THAT WILL FURTHER THE GOALS OF THE COMMISSION.
(B) THE COMMISSION SHALL CONSIDER POPULATION DIVERSITY WHEN
CARRYING OUT THE DUTIES ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION.
13–2406.
(A) THE COMMISSION, SUBJECT TO THE APPROVAL OF THE SECRETARY,
MAY ACCEPT:
(1) FEDERAL FUNDS FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) PRIVATE GIFTS AND DONATIONS FROM INDIVIDUALS, PRIVATE
ORGANIZATIONS, OR FOUNDATIONS.
(B) THE ACCEPTANCE AND USE OF FEDERAL FUNDS MAY NOT BE
CONSIDERED A COMMITMENT OF STATE FUNDS AND PLACES NO OBLIGATION ON
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY TO CONTINUE THE PURPOSE FOR WHICH THE FUNDS ARE
AVAILABLE.
13–2407.

HOUSE BILL 1552 5
EACH UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT SHALL FULLY COOPERATE WITH THE
COMMISSION IN THE PERFORMANCE OF ITS DUTIES.
13–2408.
ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 30 EACH YEAR, THE COMMISSION SHALL SUBMIT
AN ANNUAL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT INCLUDES
RECOMMENDATIONS BASED ON ITS ACTIVITIES.
13–2409.
THE COMMISSION MAY NOT ADOPT REGULATIONS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, in making appointments
under this Act, the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House
shall ensure:
(1) to the extent practicable, geographic diversity among the membership
of the Maryland Commission for Men’s Health; and
(2) that appointments are made without regard to the race, color,
disability, gender, religion, age, or national origin of the appointees.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 4 years and, at the end of September
30, 2029, this Act with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.